Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2134
Utilities district; collection of other fees for city authorized; contracts authorized.

In addition to any and all powers granted to cities of the metropolitan class and metropolitan utilities districts within and serving such cities, a city of the metropolitan class may enter into a contract with the metropolitan utilities district within its area in order to obtain the use of facilities and services of the water utility of such a district and in order to collect all or any part of a sewer use or rental fee or all or any part of a garbage and refuse removal, disposal, or recycling fee which such city may lawfully be entitled to charge and collect.

Laws 1959, c. 32, § 1, p. 187;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1108;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 34;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 64.

This section and two succeeding sections upheld as constitutional. Metropolitan Utilities Dist. v. City of Omaha, 171 Neb. 609, 107 N.W.2d 397 (1961).